North Dakota, session 69, HB1423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 65-05-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
5. Under this section, the organization may modify real estate and may provide for adaptations
and modifications to motor vehicles as follows:
a. In Except as provided in subdivision c, in the case of an injured employee who sustained
a catastrophic injury, as defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may pay an amount
not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollarsone hundred fifty thousand dollars to provide
permanent additions, remodeling, or adaptations to real estate it determines necessary.
The dollar limit is for the life of the injured employee, regardless of any subsequent claim.
This subdivision does not allow the organization to purchase any real estate.
b. In Except as provided in subdivision c, in the case of an injured employee who sustained
a catastrophic injury, as defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may pay an amount
not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollarstwo hundred thousand dollars to provide
the most cost-effective, specially equipped motor vehicle or vehicle adaptations the
organization determines medically necessary. The organization may establish factors to
be used in determining whether a specially equipped motor vehicle or adaptation is
necessary. Under this subdivision, the organization may not pay for insurance of or
maintenance of the motor vehicle. Within the dollar limit and under this subdivision, the
organization may pay for vehicle or adaptation replacement purchases. The dollar limit is
for the life of the injured employee, regardless of any subsequent claim.
c. In the case of an injured employee who has not sustained a catastrophic injury, as
defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may provide the benefits under
subdivisions a and b if the organization determines the benefits would be cost-effective
and appropriate because of exceptional circumstances as determined by the
organization.
SECTION 2. APPLICATION. This Act applies to qualifying expenditures made on or after the
effective date of this Act.

H. B. NO. 1423 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1423.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 4 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State